District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Youth Villages Grant Program Establishment Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 310 of The Prevention of Child Abuse and Neglect Act of 1977, effective
September 11, 2019 (D.C. Law 23-16; D.C. Official Code § 4-1303.10) is amended as follows:

(a) The existing text is designated as subsection (a).
(b) A new subsection (b) is added to read as follows:
“(b)(1) There is established within the Child and Family Services Agency the Youth
Villages Program to regularly provide programming and assist with and check on participating
youths’ physical, mental, and emotional well-being.
“(2)(A) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective
December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year
2027, the Agency shall solicit applications, award, administer, monitor, and evaluate grants of up
to $300,000 to eligible applicants located within the District of Columbia for the purposes of
establishing the Youth Villages Program in the District.
“(B) Grant funds may be used for operations, staffing, maintenance,
programming, and infrastructure improvements.
“(3) Each Youth Village grantee shall:
“(A) Engage and support individuals up to 25 years of age who are justice-
involved or at high risk of justice involvement, with a focus on equity and serving historically
underserved youth and neighborhoods;
“(B) Provide daily support to members of the Village, including
mentorship, peer leadership, intergenerational engagement, academic and career skills training,
civic engagement, community service, arts and culture, life-skills development, food and travel
assistance, temporary or emergency housing or shelter assistance, and connection to evidence-
informed practices that reduce negative perceptions of youth and promote positive trajectories;
“(C) Provide daily support to members of the Village, including
mentorship, peer leadership, intergenerational engagement, academic and career skills training,
civic engagement, community service, arts and culture, life-skills development, food and travel

assistance, temporary or emergency housing or shelter assistance, and connection to evidence-
informed practices that reduce negative perceptions of youth and promote positive trajectories;
“(D) To the extent possible, make available the services and supports
outlined in this section to eligible staff and volunteers;
“(E) Build sustainable neighborhood-based intergenerational networks and
facilitate community engagement and partnerships with local schools, juvenile justice agencies,
community organizations, businesses, and faith-based partners; and
“(F) Demonstrate measurable outcomes, including reductions in recidivism,
increases in school attendance, high school graduation, employment, job or skills training
enrollment, matriculation into higher education, civic/community engagement, positive identity
and perception of youth, and community reintegration.
“(3) Eligible applicants shall be registered nonprofit corporations or associations that
have applied for incorporation through the Internal Revenue Service and the D.C. Office of Tax
and Revenue and are located in the District of Columbia.
“(4) For the purposes of this subsection, the term:
“(A) “Member” means an individual under 25 years of age who enrolls in the
program and currently is or has been in contact with the juvenile justice or criminal justice
system, including arrest, diversion, probation, incarceration, or re-entry, or an individual under
age 25 who is at high risk of justice involvement as determined by risk and protective factor.
“(B) “Youth Village” means a neighborhood-based nonprofit membership-based
organization, operated by a grantee under this program, that engages youth up to age 25 who are
justice-involved or at high risk of justice involvement in structured programming, peer and adult
mentoring, intergenerational activities, community service, education/employment linkage,
social support, and other daily services as needed.

“(5) The Agency shall monitor grantee performance through periodic reporting, site
visits, and review of performance metric data. Grantees shall submit to the Agency, at intervals
determined by the Agency (but at least annually), a report that includes:
“(A) A narrative description of program activities;
“(B) Quantitative data on performance indicators related to reductions in
recidivism (or justice-system involvement rates if applicable), job or skills training
enrollment, matriculation into higher education, civic/community engagement, positive
identity and perception of youth, and community reintegration;
“(C) Quantitative data regarding the number of youth served, demographic data,
volunteer hours, mentoring matches, school and employment outcomes (such as increases
100 in school attendance, high school graduation), referrals to DC agencies, and community
101 service hours;
102 “(D) A financial report including how grant funds were expended and any
103 leveraged funds; and
104 “(E) A description of sustainability activities and future plans.
105 “(6) The Agency shall compile an annual summary report for the Council and the Mayor
106 on the Program, including the total number of grants awarded, service areas served, youth
107 outcomes, lessons learned, and recommendations for policy/practice improvements.”.
108 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
109 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
110 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
111 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
112 Sec. 4. Effective date.
113 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the

114 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
115 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
116 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).